Wisconsin, session 2025, SB219.
do enact as follows:SB219,11Section 1. 710.01 of the statutes is amended to read:SB219,2,82710.01 Aliens may acquire lands. Subject to the limitations of s. ss. 710.02, 3710.04, and 710.045, an alien may acquire and hold lands or any right thereto or 4interest therein by purchase, devise, or descent, and the alien may convey, 5mortgage, and devise the same; and if the alien shall die intestate the same shall 6descend to the alien’s heirs; and in all cases such lands shall be held, conveyed, 7mortgaged, or devised or shall descend in like manner and with like effect as if such 8alien were a native citizen of the state or of the United States.SB219,29Section 2. 710.02 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB219,2,1110710.02 (title) Limitation on nonresident aliens and corporations 11foreign ownership of agricultural land.SB219,312Section 3. 710.02 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 710.02 (1r), and 710.02 13(1r) (intro.) and (c), as renumbered, are amended to read:SB219,3,214710.02 (1r) Limitation Acreage limit. (intro.) The following persons may 15not acquire, own, or hold any interest, directly or indirectly, except an interest used 1to secure repayment of a debt incurred in good faith, in more than 640 50 acres of 2agricultural land in this state:SB219,3,63(c) 1. Corporations, limited liability companies, partnerships, or associations 4having more than 20 25 percent of their stock, securities, or other indicia of 5ownership held or owned, directly or indirectly, by persons under par. (a) or, (b), or 6(d).SB219,3,872. Trusts having more than 20 25 percent of the value of their assets held, 8directly or indirectly, for the benefit of persons under par. (a) or, (b), or (d). Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb219 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb219 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB219 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB219 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB219: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting